Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-863
Annual report; contents.

The director shall publish at least annually, in such form as he or she may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial feed together with such data on their production and use as he or she may consider advisable and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feed sold within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed on the label, except that the information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall not disclose the operations of any person.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 22.